Maryland, session 2025, SB0161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–244.
(A) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
COALITION FOR PUBLIC SAFETY TRAINING IN SCHOOLS, INC., TO BE USED FOR
INCREASING THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WITH ACCESS TO DRIVER EDUCATION AND
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION IN THE STATE:
(1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $278,750;
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, $268,300;
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, $272,100;
(4) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, $276,400;
(5) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, $280,850; AND
(6) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $216,600.
(B) (1) THE APPROPRIATIONS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE ALLOCATED AS SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE FOLLOWING ALLOCATIONS SHALL BE USED TO SUPPORT
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION
TEACHERS, ASSIST WITH TRANSPORTATION OF STUDENTS TO AND FROM CAREER
AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION TRAINING ACTIVITIES, AND SUPPORT CAREER AND
TECHNICAL EDUCATION IN SCHOOLS:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $115,000;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, $115,300;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, $115,600;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, $116,000;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, $116,250; AND

SENATE BILL 161 3
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $116,600.
(3) THE FOLLOWING ALLOCATIONS SHALL BE USED TO INCREASE THE
NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO RECEIVE DRIVER EDUCATION TRAINING AND ASSIST IN
PROVIDING DRIVER EDUCATION TRAINING:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $125,750;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, $130,000;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, $133,500;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, $137,400;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, $141,600; AND
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $85,000.
(4) THE FOLLOWING ALLOCATIONS SHALL BE USED TO SUPPORT
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION EVENTS:
(I) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, $8,000;
AND
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $6,000.
(5) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING
ALLOCATIONS SHALL BE USED TO CONDUCT AN ANNUAL EVALUATION OF THE
IMPACT OF THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION ON INCREASING THE
NUMBER OF CAREER–READY STUDENTS:
(I) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, $10,000;
AND
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $4,000.
(6) THE FOLLOWING ALLOCATIONS SHALL BE USED TO CREATE AND
UPDATE AN ONLINE APPLICATION FORM FOR A SCHOOL TO APPLY FOR FUNDING
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $20,000; AND
(II) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2032, $5,000.

SENATE BILL 161
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HIRE AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR
THAT HAS EXPERIENCE EVALUATING EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS TO CONDUCT THE
ANNUAL EVALUATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE ANNUAL EVALUATION SHALL:
(I) BE CONDUCTED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COALITION
FOR PUBLIC SAFETY TRAINING IN SCHOOLS, INC.; AND
(II) EXAMINE WHETHER FUNDING HAS:
1. INCREASED SUPPORT FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF
CAREER–READY STUDENTS;
2. PROVIDED PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TO MORE
TEACHERS; AND
3. INCREASED THE OCCUPATIONAL LITERACY OF
STUDENTS.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE ANNUAL EVALUATION REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SECTION TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE, THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT, AND THE HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 8 years and 1 month and, at the end of July
31, 2033, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.